Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 3. General Powers and Duties of the Commission
§ 23-1-304.
Classification of gray wolves.

The commission shall by rule and regulation set seasons and bag limits within those areas where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals pursuant to W.S. 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) and (II). The seasons and bag limits shall be set annually in a manner the commission determines, through rule and regulation, as necessary to reasonably ensure at least ten (10) breeding pairs of gray wolves and a total of at least one hundred (100) individual gray wolves are located in this state outside of Yellowstone National Park and the Wind River Indian Reservation at the end of the current calendar year.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 168, § 5.

For purposes of this section “breeding pair” means an adult male and an adult female gray wolf raising at least two (2) pups of the year until December 31. The number of breeding pairs shall be certified by the department prior to January 31 of each year.

The department shall institute and maintain an active program of population monitoring statewide subject to the following:

Population monitoring shall include techniques that accurately determine the population and movement of gray wolves in areas of the state where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals;

The commission is authorized to enter into memoranda of understanding with the United States fish and wildlife service or other federal agencies to ensure accurate and adequate monitoring of wolf population levels and movements;

In all areas of the state, except where otherwise provided, any person who takes a wolf shall notify the department where the take occurred within ten (10) days;

In areas of the state where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals, any person who takes a wolf shall notify the department of the take and where the take occurred within a time period set by rule and regulation, which shall not exceed seventy-two (72) hours;

In areas of the state where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals, any person who takes a wolf shall submit the wolf or parts thereof, as defined by rule and regulation, to the department for inspection within a time period established by rule and regulation which will not exceed ten (10) days;

Any information regarding the number or nature of wolves legally taken within the state of Wyoming shall only be released in its aggregate form and no information of a private or confidential nature shall be released without the written consent of the person to whom the information may refer. Information identifying any person legally taking a wolf within this state is solely for the use of the department or appropriate law enforcement offices and is not a public record for purposes of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

.

The department shall actively monitor big game animal herd populations statewide to determine whether and to what extent the gray wolf is negatively impacting big game animal herds, and thereby hunting opportunities. To the extent permitted by this title, and notwithstanding other provisions of this title by those means authorized by the commission, the department shall manage the gray wolf population as necessary to ensure the long-term health and viability of any big game animal herd that is being threatened in this state.

This section shall apply from and after the date gray wolves are removed from the list of experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species in Wyoming as provided by W.S.

23-1-108

.

The commission is authorized, through rule and regulation, to use management techniques including the use of aerial hunting and hazing by the department and issuance of permits to private landowners to take wolves to protect private property including, but not limited to, livestock and other domesticated animals from wolf depredation.

Within forty-eight (48) hours of receiving notification from a landowner or his designee that any gray wolf in those areas of the state where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals has harassed, injured, maimed or killed livestock or any domesticated animal, the department shall respond and initiate appropriate management actions. The department may use the management techniques authorized under subsection (g) of this section or any other management methods necessary, to minimize the harassing, injuring, maiming or killing of livestock and other domesticated animals in those areas of the state where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals.

At any time that there exists the number of breeding pairs of gray wolves and the number of individual gray wolves specified in subsection (a) of this section, the department is authorized to take any action necessary to reduce the effects of gray wolf predation on wild ungulate herds in areas of the state experiencing unacceptable impacts from gray wolf predation.

The commission is authorized to enter into memoranda of understanding with any federal agency or other state’s wildlife agency to carry out any provision of this section and Wyoming’s wolf management plan, including the use of aerial hunting.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations authorizing lethal control of wolves harassing, injuring, maiming or killing livestock or other domesticated animals and for wolves occupying geographic areas where chronic wolf predation occurs. The rules and regulations shall provide that nonlethal control actions will be used if lethal control could cause relisting of wolves under the endangered species act or if requested by the livestock or domesticated animal owner or agent.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations providing for issuance of permits to landowners or livestock owners for removing wolves which are harassing, injuring, maiming or killing livestock or other domesticated animals and for wolves occupying geographic areas where chronic wolf predation occurs. Permits issued or renewed under this subsection shall be valid for not more than forty-five (45) days from issuance or renewal. The permits shall be issued as long as the removals authorized by such permits could not reduce the numbers of gray wolves below ten (10) breeding pairs or a total of one hundred (100) individual gray wolves within the state and outside of Yellowstone National Park and the Wind River Indian Reservation. The rules shall provide for suspending the issuance of permits or cancelling existing permits if further lethal control could cause the numbers of gray wolves to be reduced below ten (10) breeding pairs or a total of one hundred (100) individuals in the state outside of Yellowstone National Park and the Wind River Indian Reservation.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing a fair compensation program to compensate for wolf predation on livestock as provided in W.S.

23-1-901

.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 115, § 1; 2007, ch. 168, § 3; 2008, ch. 44, § 2; 2012, ch. 25, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

rewrote (a) and (c), added the second and third sentences of (f), added “and notwithstanding other provisions of this title by those means authorized by the commission” in the second sentence of (d), and added (g)-(p).

The 2008 amendment,

repealed subsection (p), pertaining to the time limitation of October 1, 2007, of the director's report regarding the rules provided in this section.

The 2012 amendment,

rewrote (a) to specify areas where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals and providing for management for a minimum of breeding pairs and individual gray wolves; rewrote (d) amending authorized management techniques for controlling wolf populations; deleted “aggressive” after “to use” in (g); in (h), substituted “those areas of the state where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals” for “the state,” added “an initiate appropriate management actions,” deleted “aggressive” after “may uses the,” and added “in those areas of the state where gray wolves are designated as trophy game animals” at the end; rewrote (j); substituted “authorizing” for “requiring” in (m); and rewrote (n).

Laws 2012, ch. 25, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2012.

Prospective operation. —

Laws 2003, ch. 115, § 3, directs that nothing in the act is to prohibit the ownership of a wolf hybrid if the animal was owned before the effective date of the act by a person then residing in the state.

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2003, ch. 115, § 4(a) through (c), as amended by Laws 2007, ch. 168, § 4, provides:

“(a) It is the purpose of this act, unless the introduction of the gray wolf into Wyoming is determined by lawful authorities not to have been in accordance with federal law, to provide appropriate state management and control of gray wolves in order to facilitate the removal of the gray wolf from its listing as an experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species in Wyoming and to prevent future listing of the gray wolf as an experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species.

“(b) In providing appropriate state management and control of gray wolves, the state acknowledges the need to fill the current vacuum of management of this species within the state. The state retains all rights to investigate and, if determined by state officials to be appropriate, take legal actions against the federal government relating to the introduction of the gray wolf into the boundaries of this state.

“(c) In order to accomplish the purposes of this act, the game and fish commission shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with appropriate federal agencies under which the commission and federal agencies shall endeavor to manage the prey base for gray wolves in a manner to maintain a sufficient prey base in Yellowstone National Park, Grand Teton National Park and John D. Rockefeller, Jr. Memorial Parkway within the state for at least eight (8) breeding pairs of wolves. The game and fish commission shall endeavor to manage big game populations providing a prey base for seven (7) breeding pairs of gray wolves in all other areas of the state in such a manner as to mitigate to the greatest extent possible, adverse effects on opportunities for licensed hunters to take big game.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 168, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, provides: “This act shall be effective only if W.S.

23-1-109

as created by this act is in effect in accordance with the provisions of that section. The legislative service office is authorized and directed to publish the provisions of this act in the manner which most effectively displays the contingencies provided in this act.”

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Subsections (a), (c), (d) and (e) of this section were amended, subsection (b) was repealed and subsections (g) through (p) were added by 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 168, which provided the act was effective on and after July 1, 2007 only upon certification by the Governor to the Secretary of State of the occurrence of specified acts.
On February 27, 2008, in accordance with W.S. 23-1-109(f), the Governor filed with the Secretary of State his certification that all act necessary for House Enrolled Act 123 (2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 168) to become effective
had occurred.
2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 25, Section 3, provided that the legislature
found that the contingencies required by 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 168,
occurred and that the provisions became effective.
2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 25, further amended subsections (a), (d), (h), (j), (m) and (n) of this section.

Relation to Endangered Species Act.

District court erred in vacating rule delisting gray wolf as endangered species in Wyoming on grounds that provision in state's management plan for additional buffer was not legally binding, as nothing in ESA demanded that level of certainty. FSA's decision to delist in absence of legal certainty was compatible with ESA's requirements for monitoring of species after delisting for at least five years and its emergency provisions authorizing DOI to take immediate action to ensure delisted species did not become threatened or endangered again. Defenders of Wildlife v. Zinke, 849 F.3d 1077, 428 U.S. App. D.C. 3, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 3825 (D.C. Cir. 2017).

Fish and Wildlife Service exercised its judgment in reasonable way in concluding that Wyoming's management plan, which explained how state intended to carry out its day-to-day implementation of its legal obligations, would adequately protect Wyoming's gray wolf population after delisting. Given Congress's direction that state conservation efforts must be considered, their consideration as part of state’s “regulatory mechanism” was hardly contrary to congressional intent. Defenders of Wildlife v. Zinke, 849 F.3d 1077, 428 U.S. App. D.C. 3, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 3825 (D.C. Cir. 2017).

Fish and Wildlife Service did not arbitrarily conclude that genetic connectively was currently sufficient and would remain so after delisting pf gray wolves in Wyoming. Nor did Service arbitrarily conclude that Wyoming's unregulated predator area was not significant portion of wolves' range. Defenders of Wildlife v. Zinke, 849 F.3d 1077, 428 U.S. App. D.C. 3, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 3825 (D.C. Cir. 2017).

§ 23-1-305.
Closure of elk feedgrounds; alternative feeding sites; reporting requirement.

Except as authorized by subsection (b) of this section, any elk feedground authorized or administered by the commission as of July 1, 2021 and in accordance with W.S. 23-1-302(a)(ix), shall only permanently cease operations or be subject to closure by the department or commission upon a recommendation for a feedground closure by the commission and subsequent order of the governor. Any closure order issued by the governor shall only be valid and lawful upon satisfaction of the following conditions:

The commission shall provide its recommendation to the governor for the closure of the elk feedground and concurrently to the Wyoming livestock board. Upon receipt of the commission’s recommendation, the board shall provide its opinion to the governor on whether the board believes the closure of the elk feedground is appropriate;

The commission, in consultation with the Wyoming livestock board, shall conduct not less than one (1) public meeting in a location that is reasonably calculated to foster the most public participation by the people directly impacted by the proposed closure and by other vested stakeholders. The public meeting shall be held after the commission and the board have acted as required under paragraph (i) of this subsection. The commission shall compile the comments received as a result of the public meeting and provide those comments to the governor for the governor’s consideration on whether to issue an elk feedground closure order.

Any elk feedground authorized or administered by the commission may be temporarily closed by order of the governor due to emergency circumstances for a period not to exceed six (6) months after which the feedground shall only remain closed in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.

The commission is authorized to contract or lease private lands or lands owned by the state for the purpose of relocating an elk feedground authorized or administered under W.S. 23-1-302(a)(ix), which would otherwise be subject to closure under this section.

For any elk feedground authorized or administered under W.S. 23-1-302(a)(ix), which utilizes federal public lands, the department shall report to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee upon the department receiving notice that the federal authorization permitting the use of the federal public lands will not be reissued or will be revoked. The report required by this subsection shall include draft contingency plans, including associated costs with implementing the plans, identifying any appropriate private lands, lands owned by the commission or lands otherwise owned or under the authority of the state of Wyoming for the purpose of supplementing or relocating the feedground operation that is affected by the expiration of any federal public land authorization. The office of state lands and investments shall cooperate with the commission in identifying any alternative feedground sites consistent with this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the department from continuing to administer authorized elk feedground operations, including:

Commencing and ending annual elk feedground operations on dates determined by the department; and

Conducting emergency elk feeding operations when deemed necessary by the department.

History.

2021 ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 97, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.